Nebraska, session 109, LB845.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-712, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-712 (1) Upon receipt of a report pursuant to section 28-711, the
department shall determine whether to (a) accept the report for
traditional response and an investigation pursuant to section 28-713, (b)
accept the report for alternative response pursuant to section 28-712.01,
(c) accept the report for screening by the Review, Evaluate, and Decide
Team to determine eligibility for alternative response, or (d) classify
the report as requiring no further action by the department.
(2)(a) The Nebraska Children's Commission shall appoint an advisory
committee to examine the department's alternative response to reports of
child abuse or neglect and to make recommendations to the Legislature,
the department, and the commission regarding (i) the receipt and
screening of reports of child abuse or neglect by the department, (ii)
the ongoing use of alternative response, (iii) the ongoing use of
traditional response, and (iv) the provision of services within
alternative response and non-court-involved cases to ensure child safety,
to reduce the risk of child abuse or neglect, and to engage families. The
advisory committee may request, receive, and review data from the
department regarding such processes.
(b) The members of the advisory committee shall include, but not be
limited to, a representative of (i) the department, (ii) law enforcement
agencies, (iii) county attorneys or other prosecutors, (iv) the state
chapter of child advocacy centers as defined in 34 U.S.C. 20302, (v)
attorneys for parents, (vi) guardians ad litem, (vii) a child welfare
advocacy organization, (viii) families with experience in the child
welfare system, (ix) family caregivers, (x) the Foster Care Review
Office, and (xi) the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare. Members of the advisory committee shall be appointed for terms
of two years. The Nebraska Children's Commission shall appoint the
chairperson of the advisory committee and may fill vacancies on the
-2-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
advisory committee as they occur.
(2) (3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section and sections 28-710.01, 28-712.01,
and 28-713. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited
to, provisions on (a) the transfer of cases from alternative response to
traditional response, (b) notice to families subject to a comprehensive
assessment and served through alternative response of the alternative
response process and their rights, including the opportunity to challenge
agency determinations, (c) the provision of services through alternative
response, and (d) the collection, sharing, and reporting of data.
Sec. 2. Section 71-561, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-561 Sections 71-561 to 71-567 and section 8 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Disease and Other
Dementia Support Act.
Sec. 3. Section 71-563, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-563 For purposes of the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Disease and Other
Dementia Support Act:
(1) Council means the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Alzheimer's
Disease and Other Dementia Advisory Council; and
(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 4. Section 71-564, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-564 (1) The Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Alzheimer's Disease
and Other Dementia Advisory Council is created and shall include:
(a) Fifteen Twelve voting members appointed by the Governor. The
voting members shall consist of: (i) An individual living with
Alzheimer's disease or another dementia or a family member of such an
individual; (ii) an individual who is the family caregiver of an
individual living with Alzheimer's disease or another dementia; (iii) an
-3-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
individual who is a medical professional with experience diagnosing and
treating Alzheimer's disease or other dementia represents nursing homes;
(iv) an individual who represents assisted-living facilities; (v) an
individual who is a representative of a long-term care or community-based
aging organization represents providers of adult day care services; (vi)
an individual who conducts research related to Alzheimer's disease or
other dementia or represents an advocacy organization focused on dementia
represents home care providers; (vii) an individual with experience or
expertise regarding the needs of individuals with intellectual and
developmental disabilities who are aging or living with dementia; and
(viii) one representative from each of the eight planning-and-service
areas as designated in the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act a
medical professional who has experience diagnosing and treating
Alzheimer's disease; (viii) an individual who conducts research regarding
Alzheimer's disease or other dementia; (ix) an individual who represents
a leading, nationwide organization that advocates on behalf of
individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or other dementia; (x) an
individual who represents an area agency on aging; (xi) an individual
representing an organization that advocates for older adults; and (xii)
an individual with experience or expertise in the area of the specific
needs of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and
Alzheimer's disease or other dementia; and
(b) Five nonvoting members. The nonvoting members shall consist of:
(i) The Director of Public Health or the director's designee; (ii) the
Director of Developmental Disabilities Medicaid and Long-Term Care or the
director's designee; (iii) the administrator a representative of the
State Unit on Aging or the administrator's designee of the Division of
Medicaid and Long-Term Care designated by the Director of Medicaid and
Long-Term Care; (iv) a representative of the Nebraska Workforce
Development Board designated by the board; and (v) the state long-term
care ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee.
-4-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
(2) The terms of the initial members shall begin on the date of the
first meeting as called by the Director of Public Health and (a) one-
third shall serve for two-year terms, (b) one-third shall serve for
three-year terms, and (c) one-third shall serve for four-year terms,
including the chairperson and vice-chairperson. Thereafter all members
shall serve four-year terms. Members may not serve more than two
consecutive four-year terms. Vacancies shall be appointed by the Governor
in the same manner as described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section.
(3) Members of the council shall select the chairperson and vice-
chairperson who shall not be employees of the state and may serve in such
role for up to four consecutive years. The Director of Public Health or
the director's designee shall call and preside over the first meeting
until a chairperson is selected. Thereafter, the council shall meet at
least quarterly at the call of the chairperson. A majority of the voting
members shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of meetings.
(4) The council shall hold meetings at least once every calendar
quarter.
(5) Members shall serve on the council without compensation but
shall be compensated for expenses incurred for such service as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(6) The department shall provide staff and support to the council as
necessary to assist the council in the performance of its duties.
Sec. 5. Section 71-565, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-565 (1) The purpose of the council shall be to examine (a) the
needs of aging individuals and individuals living with Alzheimer's
disease or other dementia, (b) the services available in the state for
those individuals and their family caregivers, and (c) the ability of
health care providers and facilities to meet the current and future needs
of such individuals.
(2) The council shall collaborate with the department and other
-5-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
state departments as needed to gather input on issues and strategies that
pertain to aging, Alzheimer's disease, and other dementia and identify
proactive approaches on public health, workforce, caregiver support, and
care delivery. The council shall monitor analysis, policy development,
and program implementation related to aging, Alzheimer's disease, and
other dementia.
Sec. 6. Section 71-566, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-566 The council shall consider and make findings and
recommendations on the following topics:
(1) Trends in the state's Alzheimer's disease and other dementia
populations and service needs, including:
(a) The state's role in providing or facilitating long-term care,
family caregiver support, and assistance to those with early-stage or
early-onset Alzheimer's disease or other dementia;
(b) The state's policies regarding individuals with Alzheimer's
disease or other dementia;
(c) The fiscal impact of Alzheimer's disease and other dementia on
publicly funded health care programs; and
(d) The establishment of a surveillance system to better determine
the number of individuals diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease or other
dementia and to monitor changes to such numbers;
(2) Existing resources, services, and capacity relating to the
diagnosis and care of individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or
other dementia, including:
(a) The type, cost, and availability of dementia care services;
(b) The availability of health care workers who can serve people
with dementia, including, but not limited to, neurologists,
geriatricians, and direct care workers;
(c) Dementia-specific training requirements for public and private
employees who interact with people living with Alzheimer's disease or
-6-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
other dementia which shall include, but not be limited to, long-term care
workers, case managers, adult protective services, law enforcement, and
first responders;
(d) Home and community-based services, including respite care for
individuals exhibiting symptoms of Alzheimer's disease or other dementia
and their families;
(e) Quality care measures for home and community-based services and
residential care facilities; and
(f) State-supported Alzheimer's disease and other dementia research
conducted at universities located in this state; and
(3) Policies and strategies that address the following:
(a) Increasing public awareness of Alzheimer's disease and other
dementia;
(b) Educating providers to increase early detection and diagnosis of
Alzheimer's disease and other dementia;
(c) Improving the health care received by individuals diagnosed with
Alzheimer's disease or other dementia;
(d) Evaluating the capacity of the health care system in meeting the
growing number and needs of those with Alzheimer's disease and other
dementia;
(e) Increasing the number of health care professionals necessary to
treat the growing aging and Alzheimer's disease and dementia populations;
(f) Improving services provided in the home and community to delay
and decrease the need for institutionalized care for individuals with
Alzheimer's disease or other dementia;
(g) Improving long-term care, including assisted living, for those
with Alzheimer's disease or other dementia;
(h) Assisting unpaid Alzheimer's disease or dementia caregivers;
(i) Increasing and improving research on Alzheimer's disease and
other dementia;
(j) Promoting activities to maintain and improve brain health;
-7-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
(k) Improving the collection of data and information related to
Alzheimer's disease and other dementia and the resulting public health
burdens;
(l) Improving public safety and addressing the safety-related needs
of those with Alzheimer's disease or other dementia;
(m) Addressing legal protections for, and legal issues faced by,
individuals with Alzheimer's disease or other dementia; and
(n) Improving the ways in which the government evaluates and adopts
policies to assist individuals diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease or
other dementia and their families; .
(4) The collection of facts and statistics and special studies of
the conditions and problems pertaining to the employment, health,
financial status, recreation, social adjustment, or other conditions and
problems relating to the general welfare of aging individuals of the
state;
(5) State and local agencies serving aging individuals for purposes
of coordinating such agencies' activities, and reports from the various
state agencies and institutions relating to matters within the
jurisdiction of the council;
(6) The latest developments of research, studies, and programs being
conducted throughout the nation relating to the problems and needs of
aging individuals;
(7) The mutual exchange of ideas and information relating to aging
individuals among federal, state, and local governmental agencies,
private organizations, and individuals; and
(8) Cooperation with federal, state, and local agencies or private
organizations in administering and supervising demonstration programs of
services for aging individuals designed to foster continued participation
of such individuals in family and community life and to prevent, insofar
as possible, the onset of dependency and the need for long-term
institutional care.
-8-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
Sec. 7. Section 71-567, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-567 (1)(a) No later than December 31, 2024, the council shall
compile the findings and recommendations under the Alzheimer's Disease
and Other Dementia Support Act and submit them as a State Alzheimer's
Plan to the Legislature and the Governor.
(b) No later than December 31, 2028, and every Every four years
thereafter, the council shall issue an updated State Alzheimer's Plan
addressing the items in sections 71-565 and 71-566 and any other issues
the council deems necessary and relevant toward addressing Alzheimer's
disease and dementia in Nebraska.
(2) By October 1 of each year after the creation of the State
Alzheimer's Plan, the council shall electronically submit to the
Legislature and the Governor an annual report on the status of
implementation of the State Alzheimer's Plan recommendations and any
barriers to implementation.
Sec. 8. The Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council Fund
is created. The fund shall consist of federal funds and grants or gifts
for the purposes authorized by the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia
Support Act. Expenditures from the fund shall be subject to any
conditions agreed upon for receiving such funds, grants, or gifts. Such
funds, grants, or gifts shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 9. Section 71-814, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-814 (1) The State Advisory Committee on Mental Health and
Substance Use Services is created. Members of the committee shall have a
demonstrated interest and commitment and specialized knowledge,
experience, or expertise relating to the provision of mental health
-9-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
services in the State of Nebraska. The committee shall consist of twenty-
three members appointed by the Governor as follows: (a) One regional
governing board member, (b) one regional administrator, (c) twelve
consumers of behavioral health services or their family members, (d) two
providers of behavioral health services, (e) two representatives from the
State Department of Education, including one representative from the
Division of Vocational Rehabilitation of the State Department of
Education, (f) three representatives from the Department of Health and
Human Services representing mental health, social services, and medicaid,
(g) one representative from the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice, and (h) one representative from the Housing Office
of the Community and Rural Development Division of the Department of
Economic Development.
(2) The committee shall be responsible to the division and shall (a)
serve as the state's mental health planning council as required by Public
Law 102-321, (b) conduct regular meetings, (c) provide advice and
assistance to the division relating to the provision of mental health
services and, beginning July 1, 2026, substance use disorder services in
the State of Nebraska, including, but not limited to, the development,
implementation, provision, and funding of organized peer support
services, (d) promote the interests of consumers and their families,
including, but not limited to, their inclusion and involvement in all
aspects of services design, planning, implementation, provision,
education, evaluation, and research, (e) provide reports as requested by
the division, and (f) engage in such other activities as directed or
authorized by the division.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, the State Advisory Committee on Mental
Health and Substance Use Services shall also perform the duties of the
State Advisory Committee on Substance Abuse Services.
Sec. 10. Section 81-6,122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-10-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
81-6,122 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall, in
collaboration with the Department of Correctional Services, the
Department of Economic Development, the Department of Labor, the
Department of Transportation, the Department of Veterans' Affairs, the
State Department of Education, the University of Nebraska, and the Equal
Opportunity Commission, develop a comprehensive strategic plan for
providing services to qualified persons with disabilities in the most
integrated community-based settings pursuant to the Olmstead decision.
(2) The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and
Human Services shall convene a team to:
(a) Develop the strategic plan described in subsection (1) of this
section;
(b) Appoint and convene a stakeholder advisory committee to assist
in the review and development of the strategic plan, such committee
members to include a representative from the State Advisory Committee on
Mental Health and Substance Use Services, the Advisory Committee on
Developmental Disabilities, the Nebraska Statewide Independent Living
Council, the Nebraska Planning Council on Developmental Disabilities, the
Division of Rehabilitation Services in the State Department of Education,
the Public Service Commission, the Commission for the Deaf and Hard of
Hearing, the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired, a housing
authority in a city of the first or second class and a housing authority
in a city of the primary or metropolitan class, the Assistive Technology
Partnership, the protection and advocacy system for Nebraska, an
assisted-living organization, the behavioral health regions, mental
health practitioners, developmental disability service providers, an
organization that advocates for persons with developmental disabilities,
an organization that advocates for persons with mental illness, an
organization that advocates for persons with brain injuries, and an area
agency on aging, and including two persons with disabilities representing
self-advocacy organizations, and, at the department’s discretion, other
-11-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
persons with expertise in programs serving persons with disabilities;
(c) Arrange for consultation with an independent consultant to
assist with the continued analysis and revision of the strategic plan and
determine whether the benchmarks, deadlines, and timeframes are in
substantial compliance with the strategic plan;
(d) Provide continuing analysis of the strategic plan and a report
on the progress of the strategic plan and changes or revisions to the
Legislature by December 15, 2021, and every three years thereafter; and
(e) Provide the completed strategic plan to the Legislature and the
Governor by December 15, 2019.
(3) The reports and completed plan shall be submitted electronically
to the Legislature.
Sec. 11. Section 81-2205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2205 Council Committee shall mean the Aging, Alzheimer's, and
Dementia Advisory Council Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care
Advisory Committee on Aging.
Sec. 12. Section 81-2212, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2212 The council In addition to duties enumerated in section
68-1104, the committee shall advise the department regarding:
(1) The state plan on aging as developed and prepared by the
department;
(2) Policies adopted by the department;
(3) The needs of the state's older individuals;
(4) The development of the state plan and policies which affect the
state's older individuals;
(5) Such rules, regulations, and standards as may be adopted by the
department; and
(6) A community aging services budget for submission to the
Legislature by the department.
-12-

LB845 LB845
2026 2026
The council committee shall also act as a panel for the hearing and
resolution of any appeal requested by an area agency on aging should the
department disapprove the area plan and budget or amendments as
submitted.
Sec. 13. Section 81-2226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2226 In the event of a documented malfeasance on the part of any
area agency on aging in the administration of its area plan, and the
failure of the governing unit of the area agency to take corrective
action within a reasonable time, the department shall, with the advice of
the council committee, terminate funding to the area agency governing
unit by disapproving the area plan for that area agency on aging.
Sec. 14. Original sections 81-6,122, 81-2205, 81-2212, and 81-2226,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 28-712, 71-561, 71-563,
71-564, 71-565, 71-566, and 71-567, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 71-814, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
Sec. 15. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
68-1101, 68-1103, 68-1104, and 68-1106, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 68-1105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024.
-13-